Utah statutes.
9-1-802.   Definitions.

(1)  "Act" means the National Community and Service Trust Act of 1993, 42 U.S.C.  12501 et seq.

(2)  "Commission" means the Utah Commission on Volunteers created in Section 9-1-803.

(3)  "Corporation" means the Corporation for National and Community Service described in the act.



Amended by Chapter 242, 1996 General Session

